North Carolina, session 2025, SB10.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 20-7(m1) reads as rewritten:
"(m1) Mobile Drivers License. – Upon request of an applicant for whom a valid license
exists or is issued, the Commissioner may shall issue a mobile drivers license as a supplement to
the valid license. A Unless otherwise provided by law, a mobile drivers license is the legal
equivalent of a valid license.license, for any purpose, including identification."
SECTION 2. Article 1A of Chapter 20 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 20-4.13. Mobile drivers licenses.
The Commissioner shall extend reciprocity to a mobile drivers license issued by another state
if the license was issued subject to requirements substantially similar to the requirements for
mobile drivers license issuance in this State."
SECTION 3. G.S. 17C-6 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17C-6. Powers of Commission.
(a) In addition to powers conferred upon the Commission elsewhere in this Article, the
Commission shall have the following powers, which shall be enforceable through its rules and
regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of G.S. 17C-10:
…
(14) Establish minimum standards for in-service training for criminal justice
officers. In-service training standards for sworn law enforcement officers shall
include all of the following training topics:
…
j. Training to ensure appropriate interactions with mobile drivers license
holders.
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 17E-4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 17E-4. Powers and duties of the Commission.
*S10-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) The Commission shall have the following powers, duties, and responsibilities, which
are enforceable through its rules and regulations, certification procedures, or the provisions of
G.S. 17E-8 and G.S. 17E-9:
…
(11) Establish minimum standards for in-service training for justice officers.
In-service training standards for sworn law enforcement officers shall include
all of the following training topics:
…
j. Training to ensure appropriate interactions with mobile drivers license
holders.
…."
SECTION 5. G.S. 163-166.16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 163-166.16. Requirement for photo identification to vote in person.
(a) Photo Identification Required to Vote. – When a registered voter presents to vote in
person, the registered voter shall produce any of the following forms of identification that contain
a photograph of the registered voter:
(1) Any of the following that is valid and unexpired, or has been expired for one
year or less:
a. A North Carolina drivers license.license, including a mobile drivers
license as defined in G.S. 20-4.01.
…."
SECTION 6. The Division of Motor Vehicles of the Department of Transportation
may contract with a qualified vendor or vendors to develop and implement the mobile drivers
license system mandated by G.S. 20-7(m1), as modified by this act. The Division shall adopt
rules implementing the requirements of this section. No later than October 1, 2025, the Division
shall do all of the following:
(1) Develop and implement a public awareness program to inform the general
public about the availability, functionality, and security of mobile drivers
licenses.
(2) In conjunction with the North Carolina School of Government and the
Department of Public Safety, develop and implement a training program
designed to ensure law enforcement officers are appropriately equipped for
interactions with mobile drivers license holders. At minimum, the training
shall address the protections afforded by the United States and North Carolina
Constitutions and how those protections relate to mobile drivers licenses. This
training shall be made available to both State and local government law
enforcement officers no later than January 1, 2026.
(3) Notify the State Board of Elections, the Department of Public Safety, and the
Secretary of State of the pendency of mobile drivers licenses.
(4) Consult with the federal Transportation Security Administration throughout
the development and implementation of the mobile drivers license system to
ensure mobile drivers licenses comply with all federal laws and regulations.
SECTION 7. Sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 5 of this act become effective July 1, 2026. The
remainder of this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 10-First Edition